California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(3) The requirement to disclose investigative reports pursuant to this subdivision shall not include the disclosure of social services records or case files that are confidential, nor shall this subdivision allow disclosure of any reports or records if the disclosure would be prohibited by any other state or federal law.

(h) Failure to report, or impeding or inhibiting a report of, physical abuse, as defined in Section 15610.63, abandonment, abduction, isolation, financial abuse, or neglect of an elder or dependent adult, in
 violation of this section, is a misdemeanor, punishable by not more than six months in the county jail, by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment. A mandated reporter who willfully fails to report, or impedes or inhibits a report of, physical abuse, as defined in Section 15610.63, abandonment, abduction, isolation, financial abuse, or neglect of an elder or dependent adult, in violation of this section, if that abuse results in death or great bodily injury, shall be punished by not more than one year in a county jail, by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment. If a mandated reporter intentionally conceals their failure to report an incident known by the mandated reporter to be abuse or severe neglect under this section, the failure to report is a continuing offense until a law enforcement agency specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) discovers the offense.

(i) For purposes of this section, “dependent adult” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 15610.23.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 580, Sec. 1.   (AB 1417)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

15630.1.

(a) As used in this section, “mandated reporter of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult” means all officers and employees of financial institutions.

(b) As used in this section, the term “financial institution” means any of the following:

(1) A depository institution, as defined in Section 3(c) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1813(c)).

(2) An institution-affiliated party, as defined in Section 3(u) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1813(u)).

(3) A
 federal credit union or state credit union, as defined in Section 101 of the Federal Credit Union Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1752), including, but not limited to, an institution-affiliated party of a credit union, as defined in Section 206(r) of the Federal Credit Union Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1786(r)).

(c) As used in this section, “financial abuse” has the same meaning as in Section 15610.30.

(d) (1) Any mandated reporter of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult who has direct contact with the elder or dependent adult or who reviews or approves the elder or dependent adult’s financial documents, records, or transactions, in connection with providing financial services with respect to an elder or dependent adult, and who, within the scope of his or her employment
 or professional practice, has observed or has knowledge of an incident, that is directly related to the transaction or matter that is within that scope of employment or professional practice, that reasonably appears to be financial abuse, or who reasonably suspects that abuse, based solely on the information before him or her at the time of reviewing or approving the document, record, or transaction in the case of mandated reporters who do not have direct contact with the elder or dependent adult, shall report the known or suspected instance of financial abuse by telephone or through a confidential Internet reporting tool, as authorized pursuant to Section 15658, immediately, or as soon as practicably possible. If reported by telephone, a written report shall be sent, or an Internet report shall be made through the confidential Internet reporting tool established in Section 15658, within two working
 days to the local adult protective services agency or the local law enforcement agency.

(2) When two or more mandated reporters jointly have knowledge or reasonably suspect that financial abuse of an elder or a dependent adult for which the report is mandated has occurred, and when there is an agreement among them, the telephone report or Internet report, as authorized by Section 15658, may be made by a member of the reporting team who is selected by mutual agreement. A single report may be made and signed by the selected member of the reporting team. Any member of the team who has knowledge that the member designated to report has failed to do so shall thereafter make that report.

(3) If the mandated reporter knows that the elder or dependent adult resides in a long-term care facility,
 as defined in Section 15610.47, the report shall be made to the local ombudsman or local law enforcement agency.

(e) An allegation by the elder or dependent adult, or any other person, that financial abuse has occurred is not sufficient to trigger the reporting requirement under this section if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The mandated reporter of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult is aware of no other corroborating or independent evidence of the alleged financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult. The mandated reporter of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult is not required to investigate any accusations.

(2) In the exercise of his or her professional
 judgment, the mandated reporter of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult reasonably believes that financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult did not occur.

(f) Failure to report financial abuse under this section shall be subject to a civil penalty not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or if the failure to report is willful, a civil penalty not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), which shall be paid by the financial institution that is the employer of the mandated reporter to the party bringing the action. Subdivision (h) of Section 15630 shall not apply to violations of this section.

(g) (1) The civil penalty provided for in subdivision (f) shall be recovered only in a civil action brought against the financial institution
 by the Attorney General, district attorney, or county counsel. No action shall be brought under this section by any person other than the Attorney General, district attorney, or county counsel. Multiple actions for the civil penalty may not be brought for the same violation.

(2) Nothing in the Financial Elder Abuse Reporting Act of 2005 shall be construed to limit, expand, or otherwise modify any civil liability or remedy that may exist under this or any other law.

(h) As used in this section, “suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult” occurs when a person who is required to report under subdivision (a) observes or has knowledge of behavior or unusual circumstances or transactions, or a pattern of behavior or unusual circumstances or transactions, that would lead an
 individual with like training or experience, based on the same facts, to form a reasonable belief that an elder or dependent adult is the victim of financial abuse as defined in Section 15610.30.

(i) Reports of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult made by an employee or officer of a financial institution pursuant to this section are covered under subdivision (b) of Section 47 of the Civil Code.

(j) (1) A mandated reporter of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult is authorized to not honor a power of attorney described in Division 4.5 (commencing with Section
 4000) of the Probate Code as to an attorney-in-fact, if the mandated reporter of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult
 makes a report to an adult protective services agency or a local law enforcement agency of any state that the principal may be subject to financial abuse, as described in this chapter or as defined in similar laws of another state, by that attorney-in-fact or person acting for or with that attorney-in-fact.

(2) If a mandated reporter of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult does not honor a power of attorney as to an attorney-in-fact pursuant to paragraph (1), the power of attorney shall remain enforceable as to every other attorney-in-fact also designated in the power of attorney about whom
 a report has not been made.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, the terms “principal” and “attorney-in-fact” shall have the same meanings as those terms are used in Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4000) of the Probate Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 408, Sec. 1.   (AB 611)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

15630.2.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following definitions:

(1) “Financial abuse” has the same meaning as in Section 15610.30.

(2) “Broker-dealer” has the same meaning as in Section 25004 of the Corporations Code.

(3) “Investment adviser” has the same meaning as in Section 25009 of the Corporations Code.

(4) “Mandated reporter of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult” means a broker-dealer or an investment adviser.

(b) (1) Any mandated
 reporter of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult who has direct contact with the elder or dependent adult or who reviews or approves the elder or dependent adult’s financial documents, records, or transactions, in connection with providing financial services with respect to an elder or dependent adult, and who, within the scope of their employment or professional practice, has observed or has knowledge of an incident that is directly related to the transaction or matter that is within that scope of employment or professional practice, that reasonably appears to be financial abuse, or who reasonably suspects that abuse, based solely on the information before them at the time of reviewing or approving the document, record, or transaction in the case of mandated reporters who do not have direct contact with the elder or dependent adult, shall report the known or suspected instance of financial abuse by telephone or through a confidential internet reporting tool, as authorized pursuant to
 Section 15658, immediately, or as soon as practicably possible. If reported by telephone, a written report shall be sent, or an internet report shall be made through the confidential internet reporting tool established in Section 15658, within two working days to the local adult protective services agency, the local law enforcement agency, and the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(2) When two or more mandated reporters jointly have knowledge or reasonably suspect that financial abuse of an elder or a dependent adult for which the report is mandated has occurred, and when there is an agreement among them, the telephone report or internet report, as authorized by Section 15658, may be made by a member of the reporting team who is selected by mutual agreement. A single report may be made and signed by the selected member of the reporting team. Any member of the team who has knowledge that the member designated to report has
 failed to do so shall thereafter make that report.

(3) If the mandated reporter knows that the elder or dependent adult resides in a long-term care facility, as defined in Section 15610.47, the report shall be made to the local ombudsman, local law enforcement agency, and the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(c) An allegation by the elder or dependent adult, or any other person, that financial abuse has occurred is not sufficient to trigger the reporting requirement under this section if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The mandated reporter of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult is aware of no other corroborating or independent evidence of the alleged financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult. The mandated reporter of suspected financial abuse of an elder or
 dependent adult is not required to investigate any accusations.

(2) In the exercise of their professional judgment, the mandated reporter of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult reasonably believes that financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult did not occur.

(d) Failure to report financial abuse under this section shall be subject to a civil penalty not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or if the failure to report is willful, a civil penalty not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), which shall be paid by the employer of the mandated reporter of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult to the party bringing the action. Subdivision (h) of Section 15630 shall not apply to violations of this section.

(e) The civil penalty provided for in subdivision (d) shall be
 recovered only in a civil action brought against the broker-dealer or investment adviser by the Attorney General, district attorney, or county counsel. An action shall not be brought under this section by any person other than the Attorney General, district attorney, or county counsel. Multiple actions for the civil penalty may not be brought for the same violation.

(f) As used in this section, “suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult” occurs when a person who is required to report under subdivision (b) observes or has knowledge of behavior or unusual circumstances or transactions, or a pattern of behavior or unusual circumstances or transactions, that would lead an individual with like training or experience, based on the same facts, to form a reasonable belief that an elder or dependent adult is the victim of financial abuse as defined in Section 15610.30.

(g) Reports of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult made pursuant to this section are covered under subdivision (b) of Section 47 of the Civil Code.

(h) (1) A mandated reporter of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult who makes a report pursuant to this section may notify any trusted contact person who had previously been designated by the elder or dependent adult to receive notification of any known or suspected financial abuse, unless the trusted contact person is suspected of the financial abuse. This authority does not affect the ability of the mandated reporter to make any other notifications otherwise permitted by law.

(2) A mandated reporter of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult shall not be civilly liable for any notification made in good faith and with reasonable care pursuant
 to this subdivision.

(i) (1) A mandated reporter of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult is authorized to not honor a power of attorney described in Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4000) of the Probate Code as to an attorney-in-fact, if the mandated reporter of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult makes a report to an adult protective services agency or a local law enforcement agency of any state that the principal may be subject to financial abuse, as described in this chapter or as defined in similar laws of another state, by that attorney-in-fact or person acting for or with that attorney-in-fact.

(2) If a mandated reporter of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult does not honor a power of attorney as to an attorney-in-fact pursuant to paragraph (1), the power of attorney shall remain
 enforceable as to every other attorney-in-fact also designated in the power of attorney about whom a report has not been made.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, the terms “principal” and “attorney-in-fact” have the same meanings as those terms are used in Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4000) of the Probate Code.

(j) (1) A mandated reporter of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult may temporarily delay a requested disbursement from, or a requested transaction involving, an account of an elder or dependent adult or an account to which an elder or dependent adult is a beneficiary if the mandated reporter meets all of following conditions:

(A) They have a reasonable belief, after initiating an internal review of the requested disbursement or transaction and the
 suspected financial abuse, that the requested disbursement or transaction may result in the financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult.

(B) Immediately, but no later than two business days after the requested disbursement or transaction is delayed, they provide written notification of the delay and the reason for the delay to all parties authorized to transact business on the account, unless a party is reasonably believed to have engaged in suspected financial abuse of the elder or dependent.

(C) Immediately, but no later than two business days after the requested disbursement or transaction is delayed, they notify the local county adult protective services agency, local law enforcement agency, and the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation about the delay.

(D) They provide any updates relevant to the
 report to the local adult protective services agency, the local law enforcement agency, and the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(2) Any delay of a requested disbursement or transaction authorized by this subdivision shall expire upon either of the following, whichever is sooner:

(A) A determination by the mandated reporter that the requested disbursement or transaction will not result in financial abuse of the elder or dependent adult provided that the mandated reporter first consults with the local county adult protective services agency, local law enforcement agency, and the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, and receives no objection from those entities.

(B) Fifteen business days after the date on which the mandated reporter first delayed the requested disbursement or
 transaction, unless the adult protective services agency, local law enforcement agency, or the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation requests that the mandated reporter extend the delay, in which case the delay shall expire no more than 25 business days after the date on which the mandated reporter first delayed the requested disbursement or transaction, unless sooner terminated by the adult protective services agency, local law enforcement agency, the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, or an order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

(3) A court of competent jurisdiction may enter an order extending the delay of the requested disbursement or transaction or may order other protective relief based on the petition of the adult protective services agency, the mandated reporter who initiated the delay, or any other interested party.

(4) A mandated reporter
 of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult shall not be civilly liable for any temporary disbursement delay or transaction made in good faith and with reasonable care on an account pursuant to this subdivision.

(k) Notwithstanding any provision of law, a local adult protective services agency, a local law enforcement agency, and the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation may disclose to a mandated reporter of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult or their employer, upon request, the general status or final disposition of any investigation that arose from a report made by that mandated reporter of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 210.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

15631.

(a) Any person who is not a mandated reporter under Section 15630, who knows, or reasonably suspects, that an elder or a dependent adult has been the victim of abuse may report that abuse to a long-term care ombudsman program or local law enforcement agency, or both the long-term care ombudsman program and local law enforcement agency when the abuse is alleged to have occurred in a long-term care facility.

(b) Any person who is not a mandated reporter under Section 15630, who knows, or reasonably suspects, that an elder or a dependent adult has been the victim of abuse in any place other than a long-term care facility may report the abuse to the county adult protective services
 agency or local law enforcement agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 659, Sec. 3.   (AB 40)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

15632.

(a) In any court proceeding or administrative hearing, neither the physician-patient privilege nor the psychotherapist-patient privilege applies to the specific information reported pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted as requiring an attorney to violate his or her oath and duties pursuant to Section 6067 or subdivision (e) of Section 6068 of the Business and Professions Code, and Article 3 (commencing with Section 950) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 594, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Confidentiality [15633. - 15637.]

15633.

(a) The reports made pursuant to Sections 15630, 15630.1, 15630.2, and 15631 shall be confidential and may be disclosed only as provided in subdivision (b). Any violation of the confidentiality required by this chapter is a misdemeanor punishable by not more than six months in the county jail, by a fine of five hundred dollars ($500), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) Reports of suspected abuse of an elder or dependent adult and information contained in the report may be disclosed only to the following:

(1) Persons or agencies to whom disclosure of information or the identity of the reporting party is permitted under Section 15633.5.

(2) (A) Persons who are trained and qualified to serve on multidisciplinary personnel teams may disclose to one another information and records that are relevant to the prevention, identification, or treatment of abuse of elderly or dependent persons.

(B) Except as provided in subparagraph (A), any personnel of the multidisciplinary team or agency who receives information pursuant to this chapter shall be under the same obligations and subject to the same confidentiality penalties as the person disclosing or providing that information. The information obtained shall be maintained in a manner that ensures the maximum protection of privacy and confidentiality rights.

(3) A trusted contact person, as specified in subdivision (h) of Section 15630.2.

(c) This section does not allow disclosure of any reports or records relevant to the reports of abuse of an elder or dependent adult if the disclosure would be prohibited by any other provisions of state or federal law applicable to the reports or records relevant to the reports of the abuse, nor does it prohibit the disclosure by a financial institution, broker-dealer, or investment adviser of any reports or records relevant to the reports of abuse of an elder or dependent adult if the disclosure would be required of a financial institution, broker-dealer, or investment adviser by otherwise applicable state or federal law or court order.

(d) This section does not prohibit employees of a county’s adult
 protective services agency or a county’s child welfare agency from disclosing information with each other for the purpose of multidisciplinary teamwork in the prevention, intervention, management, or treatment of the abuse or neglect of a child or abuse or neglect of an elder or dependent adult.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 506, Sec. 2.   (SB 1054)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

15633.5.

(a) (1) Information relevant to the incident of elder or dependent adult abuse shall be given to an investigator from an adult protective services agency, a local law enforcement agency, the office of the district attorney, the office of the public guardian, the probate court, the division, the Department of
 Financial Protection and Innovation, or an investigator of the Department of Consumer Affairs, Division of Investigation, who is investigating a known or suspected case of elder or dependent adult abuse.

(2) (A) If the incident of elder or dependent adult financial abuse may be within the jurisdiction of a federal law enforcement agency, information relevant to the incident may be given to the federal law enforcement agency for the sole purpose of investigating a financial crime committed against the elder or dependent adult.

(B) Information relevant to the incident of elder or dependent adult abuse may be provided to a local code enforcement agency for the sole purpose of investigating an unlicensed care facility where the health and safety of an elder or dependent adult resident is at risk.

(b) The identity of a person who reports under this chapter shall be confidential and disclosed only among the following agencies or persons representing an agency:

(1) An adult protective services agency.

(2) A long-term care
 ombudsperson
 program.

(3) A licensing agency.

(4) A local law enforcement agency.

(5) The office of the district attorney.

(6) The office of the public guardian.

(7) The probate court.

(8) The division.

(9) The Department of
 Financial Protection and Innovation.

(10) The Department of Consumer Affairs, Division of Investigation.

(11) Counsel representing an adult protective services agency.

(c) The identity of a person who reports pursuant to this chapter may also be disclosed under the following circumstances:

(1) To the district attorney in a criminal prosecution.

(2) When a person reporting waives confidentiality.

(3) By court order.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions
 (a) to (c), inclusive, a person reporting pursuant to Section 15631 shall not be required to include their name in the report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 621, Sec. 1.5.   (AB 636)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

15634.

(a) No care custodian, clergy member, health practitioner, mandated reporter of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult, or employee of an adult protective services agency or a local law enforcement agency who reports a known or suspected instance of abuse of an elder or dependent adult shall be civilly or criminally liable for any report required or authorized by this article. Any other person reporting a known or suspected instance of abuse of an elder or dependent adult shall not incur civil or criminal liability as a result of any report authorized by this article, unless it can be proven that a false report was made and the person knew that the report was false. No person required to make a report pursuant to this article, or any person taking photographs at his or
 her discretion, shall incur any civil or criminal liability for taking photographs of a suspected victim of abuse of an elder or dependent adult or causing photographs to be taken of such a suspected victim or for disseminating the photographs with the reports required by this article. However, this section shall not be construed to grant immunity from this liability with respect to any other use of the photographs.

(b) No care custodian, clergy member, health practitioner, mandated reporter of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult, or employee of an adult protective services agency or a local law enforcement agency who, pursuant to a request from an adult protective services agency or a local law enforcement agency investigating a report of known or suspected abuse of an elder or dependent adult, provides the requesting agency with access to the victim of a known or suspected instance of abuse of an elder or dependent adult,
 shall incur civil or criminal liability as a result of providing that access.

(c) The Legislature finds that, even though it has provided immunity from liability to persons required to report abuse of an elder or dependent adult, immunity does not eliminate the possibility that actions may be brought against those persons based upon required reports of abuse. In order to further limit the financial hardship that those persons may incur as a result of fulfilling their legal responsibilities, it is necessary that they not be unfairly burdened by legal fees incurred in defending those actions. Therefore, a care custodian, clergy member, health practitioner, or an employee of an adult protective services agency or a local law enforcement agency may present to the Department of General Services a claim for reasonable attorneys’ fees incurred in any action against that person on the basis of making a report required or authorized by this article if
 the court has dismissed the action upon a demurrer or motion for summary judgment made by that person, or if he or she prevails in the action. The Department of General Services shall allow that claim if the requirements of this subdivision are met, and the claim shall be paid from an appropriation to be made for that purpose. Attorneys’ fees awarded pursuant to this section shall not exceed an hourly rate greater than the rate charged by the Attorney General at the time the award is made and shall not exceed an aggregate amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). This subdivision shall not apply if a public entity has provided for the defense of the action pursuant to Section 995 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 285.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

15636.

(a) Any victim of elder or dependent adult abuse may refuse or withdraw consent at any time to an investigation or the provision of protective services by an adult protective services agency or long-term care ombudsman program. The adult protective services agency shall act only with the consent of the victim unless a violation of the Penal Code has been alleged. A local long-term care ombudsman shall act only with the consent of the victim and shall disclose confidential information only after consent to disclose is given by the victim or pursuant to court order.

(b) If the elder or dependent adult abuse victim is so incapacitated that he or she cannot legally give or deny consent to protective services, a petition for temporary conservatorship or guardianship may be initiated in accordance with Section 2250 of the Probate Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 594, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

15637.

In any court proceeding or administrative hearing, neither the physician-patient privilege nor the psychotherapist-patient privilege applies to the specific information required to be reported pursuant to this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted as requiring an attorney to violate his or her oath and duties pursuant to Section 6067 or subdivision (e) of Section 6068 of the Business and Professions Code, and Article 3 (commencing with Section 950) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1164, Sec. 13.   Effective September 28, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Local Agency Cross-Reporting [15640. - 15640.]

15640.

(a) (1) An adult protective services agency shall immediately, or as soon as practically possible, report by telephone to the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the case any known or suspected instance of criminal activity, and to any public agency given responsibility for investigation in that jurisdiction of cases of elder and dependent adult abuse, every known or suspected instance of abuse of an elder or dependent adult pursuant to Section 15630, 15630.1, or 15630.2. A county adult protective services agency shall also send a written report thereof within two working days of receiving the information concerning the incident to each agency to which it is required to make a telephone report under this
 subdivision. Before making any cross-report of allegations of financial abuse to law enforcement agencies, an adult protective services agency shall first determine whether there is reasonable suspicion of any criminal activity.

(2) If an adult protective services agency receives a report of abuse alleged to have occurred in a long-term care facility, that adult protective services agency shall immediately inform the person making the report that they are required to make the report to the long-term care ombudsman program or to a local law enforcement agency. The adult protective services agency shall not accept the report by telephone but shall forward any written report received to the long-term care ombudsman.

(b) If an adult protective services agency or local law enforcement
 agency or ombudsman program receiving a report of known or suspected elder or dependent adult abuse determines, pursuant to its investigation, that the abuse is being committed by a health practitioner licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, or any related initiative act, or by a person purporting to be a licensee, the adult protective services agency or local law enforcement agency or ombudsman program shall immediately, or as soon as practically possible, report this information to the appropriate licensing agency. The licensing agency shall investigate the report in light of the potential for physical harm. The transmittal of information to the appropriate licensing agency shall not relieve the adult protective services agency or local law enforcement agency or ombudsman program of the responsibility to continue its own investigation as required
 under applicable provisions of law. The information reported pursuant to this subdivision shall remain confidential and shall not be disclosed.

(c) A local law enforcement agency shall immediately, or as soon as practically possible, report by telephone to the long-term care ombudsman program when the abuse is alleged to have occurred in a long-term care facility or to the county adult protective services agency when it is alleged to have occurred anywhere else, and to the agency given responsibility for the investigation of cases of elder and dependent adult abuse every known or suspected instance of abuse of an elder or dependent adult. A local law enforcement agency shall also send a written report thereof within two working days of receiving the information concerning the incident to any agency to which it is required to make a
 telephone report under this subdivision.

(d) A long-term care ombudsman coordinator may report the instance of abuse to the county adult protective services agency or to the local law enforcement agency for assistance in the investigation of the abuse if the victim gives their consent. A long-term care ombudsman program and the Licensing and Certification Division of the State Department of Public Health shall immediately report by telephone and in writing within two working days to the Division of Medi-Cal Fraud and Elder Abuse any instance of neglect occurring in a health care facility that has seriously harmed any patient or reasonably appears to present a serious threat to the health or physical well-being of a patient in that facility. If a victim or potential victim of the neglect withholds consent to being identified in that report,
 the report shall contain circumstantial information about the neglect, but shall not identify that victim or potential victim. The Division of Medi-Cal Fraud and Elder Abuse and the reporting agency shall maintain the confidentiality of the report until the report becomes a matter of public record.

(e) When a county adult protective services agency, a long-term care ombudsman program, or a local law enforcement agency receives a report of abuse, neglect, or abandonment of an elder or dependent adult alleged to have occurred in a long-term care facility, that county adult protective services agency, long-term care ombudsman coordinator, or local law enforcement agency shall report the incident to the licensing agency by telephone as soon as possible.

(f) County adult
 protective services agencies, long-term care ombudsman programs, and local law enforcement agencies shall report the results of their investigations of referrals or reports of abuse to the respective referring or reporting agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 554, Sec. 16.   (SB 823)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Investigation of Reports [15650. - 15651.]

15650.

(a) Investigation of reports of known or suspected instances of abuse in long-term care facilities shall be the responsibility of the division, the local law enforcement agency, and the long-term care ombudsman program.

(b) Investigations of known or suspected instances of abuse outside of long-term care facilities shall be the responsibility of the county adult protective services agency, unless another public agency is given responsibility for investigation in that jurisdiction, and the local law enforcement agency.

(c) The investigative responsibilities set forth in this section are in addition to, and not in derogation of
 or substitution for, the investigative and regulatory responsibilities of licensing agencies, such as the State Department of Social Services Community Care Licensing Division and the State Department of Public Health Licensing and Certification Division and their authorized representatives.

(d) Other public agencies involved in the investigation of abuse or advocacy of respective client populations, or both, include, but shall not be limited to, the State Department of State Hospitals and the State Department of Developmental Services. Other public agencies shall conduct or assist in, or both, the investigation of reports of abuse of elder and dependent adults within their jurisdiction in conjunction with county adult protective services, local ombudsman programs, and local law enforcement agencies.

(e) Each county adult protective services agency shall maintain an inventory of all public and private service agencies available to assist victims of abuse, as defined by Section 15610.07. This inventory shall be used to refer victims in the event that the county adult protective services agency cannot resolve the immediate needs of the victim, and to serve the victim on a long-term, followup basis. The intent of this section is to acknowledge that limited funds are available to resolve all suspected cases of abuse reported to a county adult protective services agency.

(f) Each local ombudsman program shall maintain an inventory of all public and private agencies available to assist long-term care residents who are victims of abuse, as defined by Section 15610.07. This inventory shall be used to refer cases of abuse in the event that
 another agency has jurisdiction over the resident, the abuse is verified and further investigation is needed by a law enforcement or licensing agency, or the program does not have sufficient resources to provide immediate assistance. The intent of this section is to acknowledge that ombudsman responsibility in abuse cases is to receive reports, determine the validity of reports, refer verified abuse cases to appropriate agencies for further action as necessary, and follow up to complete the required report information. Other ombudsman services shall be provided to the resident, as appropriate.
